Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1051.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Campaign


Expenditure Transparency Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The purpose of this act is to enhance transparency and


accountability in campaign financing, ensure the integrity of

Req. No. 1396 Page 1


elections, and prevent anonymous entities from undermining the


democratic process.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4263 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


For the purposes of this act, unless otherwise specified:


1. “Campaign expenditure” means any expenditure made to


influence the outcome of an election or referendum in this state;


2. “Ethics Commission” means the Ethics Commission; and


3. “Organization” means any corporation, limited liability


company, partnership, association, or other legal entity.


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4264 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. Any organization that pays for campaign expenditures


including, but not limited to, mailers, advertisements, or election


communications, shall submit to the Ethics Commission, within five


(5) business days of incurring the campaign expenditure, the


following information:


1. The name, mailing address, and contact information of its


president or chief executive officer; and


2. The name, mailing address, and contact information of its


treasurer or chief financial officer.



Req. No. 1396 Page 2


B. It shall be unlawful for any individual or organization to


engage in campaign expenditures through the use of a fictitious or


unregistered name, or through the establishment of a limited


liability company (LLC), corporation, or entity with the primary


purpose of concealing its identity. Entities engaging in campaign


expenditures through rented post office boxes shall disclose the


name and contact information of the renter and all beneficial owners


of the entity.


C. For the purposes of enforcement of this section, the


Attorney General is hereby authorized to subpoena records related to


any rented post office box, including the name and address of the


individual or entity renting the post office box and payment records


associated with the post office box. Upon request of the Ethics


Commission or upon evidence of campaign violations, the Attorney


General may obtain records from banks, LLC registrations, and


service providers to identify anonymous campaign expenditure


entities.


D. Any organization or individual found to have violated the


provisions of this act, upon conviction, shall be subject to a civil


penalty not to exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) and


a criminal fine of up to Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) for


willful violations. Any organization or individual engaging in


campaign expenditures under a false name or entity shall be required


to reimburse the State of Oklahoma for any investigative costs

Req. No. 1396 Page 3


incurred. Repeat violators shall be barred from making campaign


expenditures in this state for a period of five (5) years.


E. The Ethics Commission shall maintain a publicly accessible


database of all disclosures submitted under the provisions of this


act. The Ethics Commission shall promulgate rules necessary to


implement the provisions of this act.


SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1396 TEK 1/16/2025 2:49:46 PM























Req. No. 1396 Page 4